Missouri, session 2026, HB2217.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapters 161 and 173, RSMo, are amended by adding thereto two new
sections, to be known as sections 161.852 and 173.925, to read as follows:
161.852. 1. This section and section 173.925 shall be known and may be cited as
the "Charlie Kirk Viewpoint Diversity and Transparency Act".
2. The department of elementary and secondary education shall develop a tool
within the department's comprehensive data system that provides access to the course
syllabus and textbook information for each school district.
3. The tool shall consist of an easy-to-search database including, but not limited
to, the following:
(1) All curricula taught by the school district;
(2) Information about each textbook used for each class, subject to the
restrictions in subsection 7 of this section; and
(3) The course syllabus for each class.
4. The department of elementary and secondary education shall establish an
online form that each school district in this state shall complete with information
required under subsection 3 of this section.
5. A school district shall submit any updates to the information outlined in
subsection 3 of this section every six months. A public school or school district may
make good-faith modifications to curricula during each six-month period between
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2217 2
updates but shall not be required to submit an update of such modifications until the
next six-month update.
6. Not less than monthly, the department of elementary and secondary education
shall update the tool with the information required by this section to be submitted by
each school district and shall ensure that the tool is maintained as the primary
centralized source of information about the curriculum and instructional materials used
by public school districts.
7. (1) The information required under subdivision (2) of subsection 3 of this
section shall include at least the following for each item posted:
(a) Bibliographic information necessary to identify textbooks used for pupil
instruction. Such bibliographic information shall include at least the title, author,
organization, and a website associated with each textbook; and
(b) An internet link to any curriculum used by the public school.
(2) Each public school shall update the list posted under subdivision (1) of this
subsection each time the public school adopts a new or revised curriculum for pupil
instruction.
(3) This subsection shall not be construed to require a public school to:
(a) Digitally reproduce curricula or textbooks; or
(b) Post a curriculum or textbook in a manner that would constitute an
infringement of copyright under the federal Copyright Act of 1976 (17 U.S.C. Section
101 et seq.), as amended.
(4) This section shall apply in the 2026-27 school year and all subsequent school
years.
8. The department of elementary and secondary education may promulgate
rules to implement this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in
section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section shall
become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter
536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable
and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to
review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or
adopted after the effective date of this section shall be invalid and void.
173.925. 1. This section and section 161.852 shall be known and may be cited as
the "Charlie Kirk Viewpoint Diversity and Transparency Act".
2. As used in this section, the terms "approved institution of higher education",
"college textbook", "integrated textbook", "products", and "supplemental material"
shall have the same definitions as in section 173.955.

HB 2217 3
3. Each approved institution of higher education shall:
(1) Submit to the department of higher education and workforce development
information about all college textbooks, integrated textbooks, products, and
supplemental materials used for each course of study offered by such institution,
subject to the requirements and restrictions in subsection 4 of this section; and
(2) Submit to the department of higher education and workforce development
information about each course of study offered by such institution, subject to the
requirements and restrictions in subsection 5 of this section.
4. (1) The information required under subdivision (1) of subsection 3 of this
section shall include at least the bibliographic information necessary to identify all
college textbooks, integrated textbooks, products, and supplemental materials used for
each course of study. Such bibliographic information shall include at least the title,
author, organization, and a website associated with each textbook.
(2) This subsection shall not be construed to require an approved institution of
higher education to:
(a) Digitally reproduce college textbooks, integrated textbooks, products, or
supplemental materials; or
(b) Post college textbooks, integrated textbooks, products, or supplemental
materials in a manner that would constitute an infringement of copyright under the
federal Copyright Act of 1976 (17 U.S.C. Section 101 et seq.), as amended.
5. (1) The information required under subdivision (2) of subsection 3 of this
section shall include at least a detailed course description of each course of study
offered.
(2) A detailed course description shall include:
(a) Required meeting times for such course, whether in-person or online;
(b) How long the course modules are open for coursework completion;
(c) A clear display of the course content and curriculum including, but not
limited to, any course themes, content, core concepts, online articles, journals, websites,
videos, or any other written or oral materials; and
(d) Any other information likely to provide a more detailed description of such
course in compliance with this section.
(3) This subsection shall not be construed to require an approved institution of
higher education to post course description information in a manner that would
constitute an infringement of copyright under the federal Copyright Act of 1976 (17
U.S.C. Section 101 et seq.), as amended.
6. The department of higher education and workforce development and the
coordinating board for higher education shall:

HB 2217 4
(1) Develop an easy-to-search online database hosted by the department that
contains the information described in subsection 3 of this section for public access;
(2) Establish an online form that each faculty member of an approved institution
of higher education shall complete with information required under subsection 3 of this
section; and
(3) Update the information described in subsection 3 of this section every six
months. An institution may make good-faith modifications to such information during
each six-month period between updates but shall not be required to submit an update of
such modifications until the next six-month update.
7. This section shall apply in the 2026-27 academic year and all subsequent
academic years.
8. The coordinating board for higher education may promulgate rules to
implement this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section
536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section shall become
effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and,
if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any
of the powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to
delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held
unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or
adopted after the effective date of this section shall be invalid and void.
✔